Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.050

Auto stage.

"Auto stage" means any motor vehicle used for the purpose of carrying passengers together with incidental baggage and freight or either, on a regular schedule of time and rates: PROVIDED, That no motor vehicle shall be considered to be an auto stage where substantially the entire route traveled by such vehicle is within the corporate limits of any city or town or the corporate limits of any adjoining cities or towns.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.050. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 6; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part; 1923 c 181 s 1, part; 1921 c 96 s 2, part; 1919 c 59 s 1, part; 1917 c 155 s 1, part; 1915 c 142 s 1, part; RRS s 6313, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]